Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3701.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin SOUTH ST. PAUL; SWIMMING POOL AND AQUATICS CENTER.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin (a) $6,500,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to the city of South St. Paul for site preparation and to construct, equip, and furnish a new swimming pool and aquatics center. new text end new text begin (b) The grant under this section is exempt from the requirements under Minnesota Statutes, section 16B.325. new text end new text begin (c) The following must be incorporated into the swimming pool and aquatics center funded under this section: new text end new text begin (1) high-efficiency and low-impact lighting; new text end new text begin (2) native and pollinator-supporting landscaping; new text end new text begin (3) WaterSense certified low-flow sink and toilet plumbing features; new text end new text begin (4) daylighting in occupied spaces; new text end new text begin (5) shade features; new text end new text begin (6) amenities and accessibility features to enhance visitor travel to the facility by active transportation, as defined under Minnesota Statutes, section 174.38, subdivision 1; new text end new text begin (7) low-VOC materials to enhance indoor air quality; and new text end new text begin (8) photovoltaic-ready infrastructure. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $6,500,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end